District of Columbia statutes.
38-507

Immunization plan; suspension of chapter.

In order to implement the requirements of this chapter efficiently, the public health authorities may develop a plan under which immunization may be made available to students according to groups defined alphabetically, geographically, or by age or grade or otherwise, and upon application of the public health authorities or the Superintendent of Schools, the Mayor may suspend for no longer than one year the application of this chapter to those groups of students to whom immunization under such a plan will not be made available soon enough to avoid barring them from admission to school.

Sept. 28, 1979, D.C. Law 3-20, § 8, 26 DCR 380
1981 Ed., § 31-507.
1973 Ed., § 31-2207.